Nebraska, session 109, LB1241.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1241 LB1241
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Child abuse means an offense committed under section 28-707; and
(b) Sexual misconduct means any verbal, nonverbal, written, or
electronic communication, or any other act directed toward or with a
student that is designed to establish a sexual relationship with the
student, including a sexual invitation, dating or soliciting a date,
engaging in sexual dialogue, making sexually suggestive comments, self-
disclosure or physical exposure of a sexual or erotic nature, and any
other sexual, indecent, or erotic contact with a student. Sexual
misconduct includes sexual abuse by a school worker pursuant to section
23-316.01 or violations of a policy adopted pursuant to section 79-879
relating to relationships with students.
(2) No school board of a school district or governing authority of
an approved or accredited private, denominational, or parochial school
shall employ or contract for the paid services of any person to serve in
a position which involves regular contact with students unless the school
board or governing authority, in addition to any other requirements:
(a) Requires the applicant to provide:
(i) A list, including name, address, telephone number, and other
relevant contact information for:
(A) The applicant's current employer at the time of the application,
if any;
(B) All former schools that such applicant was employed by within
the twenty years preceding such application; and
(C) All former employers that the applicant was employed by within
the twenty years preceding such application that involved direct contact
with children;
(ii) A written authorization for the release and disclosure of any
records related to the information requested under subdivision (2)(a)(i)
of this section by the applicant's employers listed under such
subdivision to the school district or school. Such written authorization
-2-

LB1241 LB1241
2026 2026
shall also release employers from liability that may arise from the
disclosure or release of such records; and
(iii) A written statement as to whether the applicant:
(A) Has been the subject of a report of child abuse, unless the
investigation resulted in a finding that the allegations were false or
the alleged incident of child abuse or neglect was not substantiated;
(B) Has ever been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked to
resign from employment, or resigned from or otherwise separated from any
employment while allegations of child abuse or neglect or sexual
misconduct were pending or under investigation, or due to an adjudication
or finding of child abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct; or
(C) Has ever had a license, professional license, or certificate
suspended, surrendered, or revoked while allegations of child abuse or
neglect or sexual misconduct were pending or under investigation, or due
to an adjudication or finding of child abuse or neglect or sexual
misconduct; and
(b) Conducts a review of the employment history of the applicant by
contacting the employers listed by the applicant under subdivision (2)(a)
of this section and requesting the following information:
(i) The dates of employment of the applicant; and
(ii) A statement as to whether, to the extent the employer has
knowledge, the applicant:
(A) Has been the subject of a report of child abuse, unless the
investigation resulted in a finding that the allegations were false or
the alleged incident of child abuse or neglect was not substantiated;
(B) Has ever been disciplined, discharged, nonrenewed, asked to
resign from employment, or resigned from or otherwise separated from any
employment while allegations of child abuse or neglect or sexual
misconduct were pending or under investigation, or due to an adjudication
or finding of child abuse or neglect or sexual misconduct; or
(C) Has ever had a license, professional license, or certificate
-3-

LB1241 LB1241
2026 2026
suspended, surrendered, or revoked while allegations of child abuse or
neglect or sexual misconduct were pending or under investigation, or due
to an adjudication or finding of child abuse or neglect or sexual
misconduct.
(3) The review of an applicant's employment history and background
information as provided pursuant to this section may be conducted through
telephonic, electronic, or written communications. If the review is
conducted by telephone, the results of the review shall be documented in
writing by the prospective employer.
(4)(a) An applicant who willfully provides false information or
willfully fails to disclose information required in subdivision (2)(a) of
this section shall be subject to discipline up to, and including, (a)
termination or denial of employment, (b) reporting to the state agency or
other entity with authority to revoke any relevant certificate or
license, or (c) being subject to a civil penalty of not more than five
hundred dollars. Any penalty collected pursuant to this subsection shall
be distributed pursuant to Article VII, section 5, of the Constitution of
Nebraska.
(b) The school board or the governing authority of an approved or
accredited private, denominational, or parochial school shall include a
notification of the penalties set forth in this section on all
applications for employment for positions which involve regular contact
with students.
(c) The school board or the governing authority of an approved or
accredited private, denominational, or parochial school shall have the
right to immediately terminate an individual's employment or rescind an
offer of employment if:
(i) The applicant is offered employment or commences employment or
contracted services with the school following the effective date of this
act;
(ii) Information regarding the applicant's history of child abuse or
-4-

LB1241 LB1241
2026 2026
sexual misconduct is subsequently discovered or obtained by the employer
that the employer determines disqualifies the applicant or employee from
employment with the school; and
(iii) The termination of employment pursuant to this subdivision (4)
(c) shall not be subject to any grievance or appeals procedures or tenure
proceedings pursuant to any collective bargaining or negotiated
agreement.
(5) After reviewing the information disclosed under subdivision (2)
(a) of this section and finding an affirmative response to any of the
inquiries in subdivision (2)(a)(iii) of this section, the school board or
board of education, prior to determining to continue with the applicant's
job application process, shall make further inquiries of the applicant's
current or former employer to ascertain additional details regarding the
matter disclosed.
(6) A school board or a governing authority of an approved or
accredited private, denominational, or parochial school may employ or
contract with an applicant on a provisional basis for a period not to
exceed ninety days pending review by the school board or the governing
authority of information received pursuant to subsection (2) of this
section, provided that all of the following conditions are satisfied:
(a) The applicant has complied with subsection (2) of this section;
(b) The school board or the governing authority has no knowledge or
information pertaining to the applicant that the applicant is required to
disclose pursuant to subdivision (2)(a)(iii) of this section; and
(c) The school board or the governing authority determines that
special or emergent circumstances exist that justify the temporary
employment of the applicant.
(7) Information received by a school board or a governing authority
under this section shall not be considered a public record subject to
disclosure pursuant to sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(8)(a) A school board or a governing authority that receives a
-5-

LB1241 LB1241
2026 2026
request for information or records regarding an applicant pursuant to and
in accordance with this section from another school board or board of
education shall provide such information and respond to such inquiries as
soon as practicable.
(b) An employer that provides information or records about a current
or former employee or applicant shall be immune from criminal and civil
liability for the disclosure of the information, unless the information
or any record provided was knowingly false. The immunity shall be in
addition to and not in limitation of any other immunity provided by law.
(9)(a) On or after the effective date of this act, a school board or
a governing authority of an approved or accredited public, private,
denominational, or parochial school may not enter into an agreement, an
employment contract, an agreement for resignation or termination, a
severance agreement, or any other contract or agreement or take any
action that:
(i) Has the effect of suppressing or destroying information relating
to an investigation related to a report of suspected child abuse or
sexual misconduct by a current or former employee;
(ii) Affects the ability of the school board or the governing
authority to report suspected child abuse or sexual misconduct to the
appropriate authorities; or
(iii) Requires the school board or the governing authority to
expunge information about allegations or findings of suspected child
abuse or sexual misconduct from any documents maintained by the school
unless, after investigation, the allegations are found to be false or the
alleged incident of child abuse or sexual misconduct has not been
substantiated.
(b) Any provision of an employment contract or agreement for
resignation or termination or a severance agreement that is entered into,
amended, or renewed after the effective date of this act and that is
contrary to this section shall be void and unenforceable.
-6-

LB1241 LB1241
2026 2026
(10) The State Department of Education shall establish a public
awareness campaign to publicize the provisions of this section and to
ensure applicants and employers are aware of their respective rights and
responsibilities under this section. The department shall post on its
website guidance documents and any other informational materials that may
assist applicants and employers in the implementation of and compliance
with this section.
-7-